Utah statutes.
3-1-9.   Powers.
(1)  An association formed under this act, or an association which might be
formed under this act and which existed at the time this act took effect,
shall have power and capacity to act possessed by natural persons and may do
each and everything necessary, suitable, or proper for the accomplishment of
any one or more of the purposes, or the attainment of any one or more of the
objects herein enumerated or conducive to or expedient for the interests or
benefit of the association, and may exercise all powers, rights, and
privileges necessary or incident thereto, including the exercise of any
rights, powers, and privileges granted by the laws of this state to
corporations generally, excepting such as are inconsistent with the express
provisions of this act.
(2)  Without limiting or enlarging the grant of authority contained in
Subsection (1), it is hereby specifically provided that every such association
shall have authority:
(a)  to act as agent, broker, or attorney in fact for its members and other
producers, and for any subsidiary or affiliated association, and otherwise to
assist or join with associations engaged in any one or more of the activities
authorized by its articles, and to hold title for its members and other
producers, and for subsidiary and affiliated association to property handled
or managed by the association on their behalf;
(b)  to make contracts and to exercise by its board or duly authorized
officers or agents, all such incidental powers as may be necessary, suitable
or proper for the accomplishment of the purposes of the association and not
inconsistent with law or its articles, and that may be conducive to or
expedient for the interest or benefit of the association;
(c)  to make loans or advances to members or producer-patrons or to the
members of an association which is itself a member or subsidiary thereof; to
purchase, or otherwise acquire, endorse, discount, or sell any evidence of
debt, obligation or security;
(d)  to establish and accumulate reasonable reserves and surplus funds and to
abolish the same; also to create, maintain, and terminate revolving funds or
other similar funds which may be provided for in the bylaws of the
association;
(e)  to own and hold membership in or shares of the stock of other
associations and corporations and the bonds or other obligations thereof,
engaged in any related activity; or, in producing, warehousing or marketing
any of the products handled by the association; or, in financing its
activities; and while the owner thereof, to exercise all the rights of
ownership, including the right to vote thereon;
(f)  to acquire, hold, sell, dispose of, pledge, or mortgage, any property
which its purposes may require;
(g)  to borrow money without limitation as to amount, and to give its notes,
bonds, or other obligations therefor and secure the payment thereof by
mortgage or pledge;
(h)  to deal in products of, and handle machinery, equipment, supplies and
perform services for nonmembers to an amount not greater in annual value than
such as are dealt in, handled or performed for or on behalf of its members,
but the value of the annual purchases made for persons who are neither members
nor producers shall not exceed 15 per centum of the value of all its
purchases. Business transacted by an association for or on behalf of the
United States or any agency or instrumentality thereof, shall be disregarded
in determining the volume or value of member and nonmember business transacted
by such association;
(i)  if engaged in marketing the products of its members, to hedge its
operations;
(j)  to have a corporate seal and to alter the same at pleasure;
(k)  to continue as a corporation for the time limited in its articles, and if
no time limit is specified then perpetually;
(l)  to sue and be sued in its corporate name;
(m)  to conduct business in this state and elsewhere as may be permitted by
law; and
(n)  to dissolve and wind up.
